Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.07
Optional procedure.

The right of a judgment creditor to bring an action to enforce his or her judgment instead of proceeding under the Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act remains unimpaired.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 7.